Missouri, session 2026, HB2672.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 137, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 137.1054, to read as follows:
137.1054. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Disabled Veteran Personal Property Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "County", any county or city not within a county in this state;
(2) "Credit percentage", the same percentage as the eligible veteran's disability
rating, not to exceed one hundred percent;
(3) "Disability rating", the percentage of disability assigned to a disabled
veteran by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, reflecting the degree to
which the veteran's disability impacts his or her ability to work and perform daily
activities, expressed as a whole number percentage;
(4) "Disabled veteran", a Missouri resident who has been separated under
honorable conditions from active service in any branch or reserve component of the
Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard of a state as defined in 32
U.S.C. Section 101, as amended, and has a service-connected disability and has received
a disability rating of seventy percent or greater, as certified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2672 2
(5) "Eligible veteran", an individual who is a disabled veteran, is a resident of
the county adopting an ordinance under this section, owns and maintains a qualified
vehicle in this state, and is liable for the payment of personal property taxes on the
qualified vehicle;
(6) "Personal property tax credit", a credit against an eligible owner's liability
for tax on the qualified residence that is levied and imposed by the governing body of a
county or other political subdivision of this state with the power to levy and impose taxes
on real property in this state;
(7) "Qualified personal property assessment", the total assessed valuation of
each qualified vehicle as determined annually by the county assessor;
(8) "Qualified tax liability", the total personal property taxes levied on each
qualifying vehicle for the tax year, excluding any taxes levied for the blind pension fund;
(9) "Qualified vehicle", a motor vehicle titled solely in the name of the eligible
veteran or jointly with the eligible veteran's spouse, licensed in Missouri as required
under chapter 301, and used primarily for personal, noncommercial purposes.
3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a county may
authorize a personal property tax credit for eligible veterans in an amount equal to the
credit percentage applied to the qualified tax liability for each qualified vehicle, up to
two vehicles, if such county adopts an order, ordinance, or resolution authorizing such
personal property tax credit.
(2) A county that adopts and authorizes a personal property tax credit under the
provisions of this section may authorize:
(a) A uniform credit percentage equal to the eligible veteran's disability rating;
or
(b) A schedule of credit percentages based on disability rating tiers, provided
that no credit shall be granted for a disability rating below seventy percent.
4. (1) For each tax year in which a personal property tax credit is authorized
under this section, the county collector shall apply the credit or credits to the eligible
veteran's personal property tax bill after determining the total amount of his or her
qualified tax liability.
(2) Personal property tax credits authorized under the provisions of this section
shall reduce the amount of personal property taxes the eligible veteran is required to
pay but shall not alter the assessed valuation of the qualified vehicle, the levy applied by
any taxing authority, or the tax base used by any taxing authority and shall not be
construed as an exemption from personal property taxes. The eligible veteran shall
remain responsible for all taxes levied for the blind pension fund, which shall not be
subject to any credit authorized under this section.

HB 2672 3
(3) Personal property tax credits issued under the provisions of this section shall
not be refundable. No personal property tax credit claimed under this section shall be
carried forward to any subsequent tax year. The personal property tax credit allowed
under this section shall not be transferred, assigned, sold, or otherwise conveyed.
5. An eligible veteran shall annually provide a copy of his or her current
disability rating letter from the Department of Veterans Affairs and proof of ownership
and registration for each qualified vehicle. A county may create a simplified renewal
process for eligible veterans whose disability rating is permanent and total or otherwise
designated as static by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
6. The governing body of the county may adopt reasonable procedures and
promulgate ordinances, rules, and regulations in order to implement and administer the
provisions of this section, including application deadlines, documentation requirements,
and renewal processes. Eligibility determinations shall be made in accordance with
guidelines established by this section and any additional local rules or regulations. The
department of revenue may provide optional guidance, but implementation shall be
conducted at the county level.
7. (1) For the purposes of calculating property tax rates, school district
operating levy determinations, county revenue reporting, constitutional rollback
calculations, and all other state or local revenue adjustment formulas, the total
amount of personal property tax credits authorized under this section shall be
considered tax revenue actually received by the county, political subdivision, or other
taxing authority.
(2) No taxing authority shall increase its operating levy or debt service levy, or
claim a revenue shortfall as a result of credits granted under the provisions of this
section.
(3) A personal property tax credit granted under this section shall not affect the
process of setting the tax rate as required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution
of Missouri and section 137.073 in any prior, current, or subsequent tax year.
(4) Nothing in this section shall impair the obligation of any contract, reduce or
restrict the taxing authority of any political subdivision, or alter the calculation of
assessed valuation for the purposes of bonded indebtedness.
8. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any county to adopt or
authorize the personal property tax credit provided under this section. Adoption shall
be solely at the discretion of the county governing body.
✔